Illinois, session 104th, HB4908.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/10)  (from Ch. 127, par. 530)7    Sec. 10. Contributions by the State and members. 8    (a) The State shall pay the cost of basic non-contributory 9group life insurance and, subject to member paid contributions 10set by the Department or required by this Section and except as 11provided in this Section, the basic program of group health 12benefits on each eligible member, except a member, not 13otherwise covered by this Act, who has retired as a 14participating member under Article 2 of the Illinois Pension 15Code but is ineligible for the retirement annuity under 16Section 2-119 of the Illinois Pension Code, and part of each 17eligible member's and retired member's premiums for health 18insurance coverage for enrolled dependents as provided by 19Section 9. The State shall pay the cost of the basic program of 20group health benefits only after benefits are reduced by the 21amount of benefits covered by Medicare for all members and 22dependents who are eligible for benefits under Social Security 23or the Railroad Retirement system or who had sufficient   HB4908- 2 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1Medicare-covered government employment, except that such 2reduction in benefits shall apply only to those members and 3dependents who (1) first become eligible for such Medicare 4coverage on or after July 1, 1992; or (2) are 5Medicare-eligible members or dependents of a local government 6unit which began participation in the program on or after July 71, 1992; or (3) remain eligible for, but no longer receive 8Medicare coverage which they had been receiving on or after 9July 1, 1992. The Department may determine the aggregate level 10of the State's contribution on the basis of actual cost of 11medical services adjusted for age, sex or geographic or other 12demographic characteristics which affect the costs of such 13programs.14    The cost of participation in the basic program of group 15health benefits for the dependent or survivor of a living or 16deceased retired employee who was formerly employed by the 17University of Illinois in the Cooperative Extension Service 18and would be an annuitant but for the fact that he or she was 19made ineligible to participate in the State Universities 20Retirement System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 2115-107 of the Illinois Pension Code shall not be greater than 22the cost of participation that would otherwise apply to that 23dependent or survivor if he or she were the dependent or 24survivor of an annuitant under the State Universities 25Retirement System.26    (a-1) (Blank).   HB4908- 3 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1    (a-2) (Blank).2    (a-3) (Blank).3    (a-4) (Blank).4    (a-5) (Blank).5    (a-6) (Blank).6    (a-7) (Blank).7    (a-8) Any annuitant, survivor, or retired employee may 8waive or terminate coverage in the program of group health 9benefits. Any such annuitant, survivor, or retired employee 10who has waived or terminated coverage may enroll or re-enroll 11in the program of group health benefits only during the annual 12benefit choice period, as determined by the Director; except 13that in the event of termination of coverage due to nonpayment 14of premiums, the annuitant, survivor, or retired employee may 15not re-enroll in the program.16    (a-8.5) Beginning on July 1, 2012 (the effective date of 17Public Act 97-695), the Director of Central Management 18Services shall, on an annual basis, determine the amount that 19the State shall contribute toward the basic program of group 20health benefits on behalf of annuitants (including individuals 21who (i) participated in the General Assembly Retirement 22System, the State Employees' Retirement System of Illinois, 23the State Universities Retirement System, the Teachers' 24Retirement System of the State of Illinois, or the Judges 25Retirement System of Illinois and (ii) qualify as annuitants 26under subsection (b) of Section 3 of this Act), survivors   HB4908- 4 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1(including individuals who (i) receive an annuity as a 2survivor of an individual who participated in the General 3Assembly Retirement System, the State Employees' Retirement 4System of Illinois, the State Universities Retirement System, 5the Teachers' Retirement System of the State of Illinois, or 6the Judges Retirement System of Illinois and (ii) qualify as 7survivors under subsection (q) of Section 3 of this Act), and 8retired employees (as defined in subsection (p) of Section 3 9of this Act). The remainder of the cost of coverage for each 10annuitant, survivor, or retired employee, as determined by the 11Director of Central Management Services, shall be the 12responsibility of that annuitant, survivor, or retired 13employee.14    Contributions required of annuitants, survivors, and 15retired employees shall be the same for all retirement systems 16and shall also be based on whether an individual has made an 17election under Section 15-135.1 of the Illinois Pension Code. 18Contributions may be based on annuitants', survivors', or 19retired employees' Medicare eligibility, but may not be based 20on Social Security eligibility.21    (a-9) No later than May 1 of each calendar year, the 22Director of Central Management Services shall certify in 23writing to the Executive Secretary of the State Employees' 24Retirement System of Illinois the amounts of the Medicare 25supplement health care premiums and the amounts of the health 26care premiums for all other retirees who are not Medicare   HB4908- 5 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1eligible.2    A separate calculation of the premiums based upon the 3actual cost of each health care plan shall be so certified.4    The Director of Central Management Services shall provide 5to the Executive Secretary of the State Employees' Retirement 6System of Illinois such information, statistics, and other 7data as he or she may require to review the premium amounts 8certified by the Director of Central Management Services.9    The Department of Central Management Services, or any 10successor agency designated to procure health care contracts 11pursuant to this Act, is authorized to establish funds, 12separate accounts provided by any bank or banks as defined by 13the Illinois Banking Act, or separate accounts provided by any 14savings and loan association or associations as defined by the 15Illinois Savings and Loan Act of 1985 to be held by the 16Director, outside the State treasury, for the purpose of 17receiving the transfer of moneys from the Local Government 18Health Insurance Reserve Fund. The Department may promulgate 19rules further defining the methodology for the transfers. Any 20interest earned by moneys in the funds or accounts shall inure 21to the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund. The 22transferred moneys, and interest accrued thereon, shall be 23used exclusively for transfers to administrative service 24organizations or their financial institutions for payments of 25claims to claimants and providers under the self-insurance 26health plan. The transferred moneys, and interest accrued   HB4908- 6 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1thereon, shall not be used for any other purpose including, 2but not limited to, reimbursement of administration fees due 3the administrative service organization pursuant to its 4contract or contracts with the Department. 5    (a-10) To the extent that participation, benefits, or 6premiums under this Act are based on a person's service credit 7under an Article of the Illinois Pension Code, service credit 8terminated in exchange for an accelerated pension benefit 9payment under Section 14-147.5, 15-185.5, or 16-190.5 of that 10Code shall be included in determining a person's service 11credit for the purposes of this Act. 12    (b) State employees who become eligible for this program 13on or after January 1, 1980 in positions normally requiring 14actual performance of duty not less than 1/2 of a normal work 15period but not equal to that of a normal work period, shall be 16given the option of participating in the available program. If 17the employee elects coverage, the State shall contribute on 18behalf of such employee to the cost of the employee's benefit 19and any applicable dependent supplement, that sum which bears 20the same percentage as that percentage of time the employee 21regularly works when compared to normal work period.22    (c) The basic non-contributory coverage from the basic 23program of group health benefits shall be continued for each 24employee not in pay status or on active service by reason of 25(1) leave of absence due to illness or injury, (2) authorized 26educational leave of absence or sabbatical leave, or (3)   HB4908- 7 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1military leave. This coverage shall continue until expiration 2of authorized leave and return to active service, but not to 3exceed 24 months for leaves under item (1) or (2). This 424-month limitation and the requirement of returning to active 5service shall not apply to persons receiving ordinary or 6accidental disability benefits or retirement benefits through 7the appropriate State retirement system or benefits under the 8Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 9Diseases Act.10    (d) The basic group life insurance coverage shall 11continue, with full State contribution, where such person is 12(1) absent from active service by reason of disability arising 13from any cause other than self-inflicted, (2) on authorized 14educational leave of absence or sabbatical leave, or (3) on 15military leave.16    (e) Where the person is in non-pay status for a period in 17excess of 30 days or on leave of absence, other than by reason 18of disability, educational or sabbatical leave, or military 19leave, such person may continue coverage only by making 20personal payment equal to the amount normally contributed by 21the State on such person's behalf. Such payments and coverage 22may be continued: (1) until such time as the person returns to 23a status eligible for coverage at State expense, but not to 24exceed 24 months or (2) until such person's employment or 25annuitant status with the State is terminated (exclusive of 26any additional service imposed pursuant to law).  HB4908- 8 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1    (f) The Department shall establish by rule the extent to 2which other employee benefits will continue for persons in 3non-pay status or who are not in active service.4    (g) The State shall not pay the cost of the basic 5non-contributory group life insurance, program of health 6benefits and other employee benefits for members who are 7survivors as defined by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection 8(q) of Section 3 of this Act. The costs of benefits for these 9survivors shall be paid by the survivors or by the University 10of Illinois Cooperative Extension Service, or any combination 11thereof. However, the State shall pay the amount of the 12reduction in the cost of participation, if any, resulting from 13the amendment to subsection (a) made by Public Act 91-617.14    (h) Those persons occupying positions with any department 15as a result of emergency appointments pursuant to Section 8b.8 16of the Personnel Code who are not considered employees under 17this Act shall be given the option of participating in the 18programs of group life insurance, health benefits and other 19employee benefits. Such persons electing coverage may 20participate only by making payment equal to the amount 21normally contributed by the State for similarly situated 22employees. Such amounts shall be determined by the Director. 23Such payments and coverage may be continued until such time as 24the person becomes an employee pursuant to this Act or such 25person's appointment is terminated.26    (i) Any unit of local government within the State of   HB4908- 9 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1Illinois may apply to the Director to have its employees, 2annuitants, and their dependents provided group health 3coverage under this Act on a non-insured basis. To 4participate, a unit of local government must agree to enroll 5all of its employees, who may select coverage under any group 6health benefits plan made available by the Department under 7the health benefits program established under this Section or 8a health maintenance organization that has contracted with the 9State to be available as a health care provider for employees 10as defined in this Act. A unit of local government must remit 11the entire cost of providing coverage under the health 12benefits program established under this Section or, for 13coverage under a health maintenance organization, an amount 14determined by the Director based on an analysis of the sex, 15age, geographic location, or other relevant demographic 16variables for its employees, except that the unit of local 17government shall not be required to enroll those of its 18employees who are covered spouses or dependents under the 19State group health benefits plan or another group policy or 20plan providing health benefits as long as (1) an appropriate 21official from the unit of local government attests that each 22employee not enrolled is a covered spouse or dependent under 23this plan or another group policy or plan, and (2) at least 50% 24of the employees are enrolled and the unit of local government 25remits the entire cost of providing coverage to those 26employees, except that a participating school district must   HB4908- 10 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1have enrolled at least 50% of its full-time employees who have 2not waived coverage under the district's group health plan by 3participating in a component of the district's cafeteria plan. 4A participating school district is not required to enroll a 5full-time employee who has waived coverage under the 6district's health plan, provided that an appropriate official 7from the participating school district attests that the 8full-time employee has waived coverage by participating in a 9component of the district's cafeteria plan. For the purposes 10of this subsection, "participating school district" includes a 11unit of local government whose primary purpose is education as 12defined by the Department's rules.13    Employees of a participating unit of local government who 14are not enrolled due to coverage under another group health 15policy or plan may enroll in the event of a qualifying change 16in status, special enrollment, special circumstance as defined 17by the Director, or during the annual benefit choice period. A 18participating unit of local government may also elect to cover 19its annuitants. Dependent coverage shall be offered on an 20optional basis, with the costs paid by the unit of local 21government, its employees, or some combination of the two as 22determined by the unit of local government. The unit of local 23government shall be responsible for timely collection and 24transmission of dependent premiums.25    The Director shall annually determine monthly rates of 26payment, subject to the following constraints:  HB4908- 11 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1        (1) In the first year of coverage, the rates shall be 2    equal to the amount normally charged to State employees 3    for elected optional coverages or for enrolled dependents 4    coverages or other contributory coverages, or contributed 5    by the State for basic insurance coverages on behalf of 6    its employees, adjusted for differences between State 7    employees and employees of the local government in age, 8    sex, geographic location or other relevant demographic 9    variables, plus an amount sufficient to pay for the 10    additional administrative costs of providing coverage to 11    employees of the unit of local government and their 12    dependents.13        (2) In subsequent years, a further adjustment shall be 14    made to reflect the actual prior years' claims experience 15    of the employees of the unit of local government.16    In the case of coverage of local government employees 17under a health maintenance organization, the Director shall 18annually determine for each participating unit of local 19government the maximum monthly amount the unit may contribute 20toward that coverage, based on an analysis of (i) the age, sex, 21geographic location, and other relevant demographic variables 22of the unit's employees and (ii) the cost to cover those 23employees under the State group health benefits plan. The 24Director may similarly determine the maximum monthly amount 25each unit of local government may contribute toward coverage 26of its employees' dependents under a health maintenance   HB4908- 12 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1organization.2    Monthly payments by the unit of local government or its 3employees for group health benefits plan or health maintenance 4organization coverage shall be deposited into the Local 5Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund.6    The Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund is 7hereby created as a nonappropriated trust fund to be held 8outside the State treasury, with the State Treasurer as 9custodian. The Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund 10shall be a continuing fund not subject to fiscal year 11limitations. The Local Government Health Insurance Reserve 12Fund is not subject to administrative charges or charge-backs, 13including, but not limited to, those authorized under Section 148h of the State Finance Act. All revenues arising from the 15administration of the health benefits program established 16under this Section shall be deposited into the Local 17Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund. Any interest earned 18on moneys in the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve 19Fund shall be deposited into the Fund. All expenditures from 20this Fund shall be used for payments for health care benefits 21for local government and rehabilitation facility employees, 22annuitants, and dependents, and to reimburse the Department or 23its administrative service organization for all expenses 24incurred in the administration of benefits. No other State 25funds may be used for these purposes.26    A local government employer's participation or desire to   HB4908- 13 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1participate in a program created under this subsection shall 2not limit that employer's duty to bargain with the 3representative of any collective bargaining unit of its 4employees.5    (j) Any rehabilitation facility within the State of 6Illinois may apply to the Director to have its employees, 7annuitants, and their eligible dependents provided group 8health coverage under this Act on a non-insured basis. To 9participate, a rehabilitation facility must agree to enroll 10all of its employees and remit the entire cost of providing 11such coverage for its employees, except that the 12rehabilitation facility shall not be required to enroll those 13of its employees who are covered spouses or dependents under 14this plan or another group policy or plan providing health 15benefits as long as (1) an appropriate official from the 16rehabilitation facility attests that each employee not 17enrolled is a covered spouse or dependent under this plan or 18another group policy or plan, and (2) at least 50% of the 19employees are enrolled and the rehabilitation facility remits 20the entire cost of providing coverage to those employees. 21Employees of a participating rehabilitation facility who are 22not enrolled due to coverage under another group health policy 23or plan may enroll in the event of a qualifying change in 24status, special enrollment, special circumstance as defined by 25the Director, or during the annual benefit choice period. A 26participating rehabilitation facility may also elect to cover   HB4908- 14 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1its annuitants. Dependent coverage shall be offered on an 2optional basis, with the costs paid by the rehabilitation 3facility, its employees, or some combination of the 2 as 4determined by the rehabilitation facility. The rehabilitation 5facility shall be responsible for timely collection and 6transmission of dependent premiums.7    The Director shall annually determine quarterly rates of 8payment, subject to the following constraints:9        (1) In the first year of coverage, the rates shall be 10    equal to the amount normally charged to State employees 11    for elected optional coverages or for enrolled dependents 12    coverages or other contributory coverages on behalf of its 13    employees, adjusted for differences between State 14    employees and employees of the rehabilitation facility in 15    age, sex, geographic location or other relevant 16    demographic variables, plus an amount sufficient to pay 17    for the additional administrative costs of providing 18    coverage to employees of the rehabilitation facility and 19    their dependents.20        (2) In subsequent years, a further adjustment shall be 21    made to reflect the actual prior years' claims experience 22    of the employees of the rehabilitation facility.23    Monthly payments by the rehabilitation facility or its 24employees for group health benefits shall be deposited into 25the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund.26    (k) Any domestic violence shelter or service within the   HB4908- 15 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1State of Illinois may apply to the Director to have its 2employees, annuitants, and their dependents provided group 3health coverage under this Act on a non-insured basis. To 4participate, a domestic violence shelter or service must agree 5to enroll all of its employees and pay the entire cost of 6providing such coverage for its employees. The domestic 7violence shelter shall not be required to enroll those of its 8employees who are covered spouses or dependents under this 9plan or another group policy or plan providing health benefits 10as long as (1) an appropriate official from the domestic 11violence shelter attests that each employee not enrolled is a 12covered spouse or dependent under this plan or another group 13policy or plan and (2) at least 50% of the employees are 14enrolled and the domestic violence shelter remits the entire 15cost of providing coverage to those employees. Employees of a 16participating domestic violence shelter who are not enrolled 17due to coverage under another group health policy or plan may 18enroll in the event of a qualifying change in status, special 19enrollment, or special circumstance as defined by the Director 20or during the annual benefit choice period. A participating 21domestic violence shelter may also elect to cover its 22annuitants. Dependent coverage shall be offered on an optional 23basis, with employees, or some combination of the 2 as 24determined by the domestic violence shelter or service. The 25domestic violence shelter or service shall be responsible for 26timely collection and transmission of dependent premiums.  HB4908- 16 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1    The Director shall annually determine rates of payment, 2subject to the following constraints:3        (1) In the first year of coverage, the rates shall be 4    equal to the amount normally charged to State employees 5    for elected optional coverages or for enrolled dependents 6    coverages or other contributory coverages on behalf of its 7    employees, adjusted for differences between State 8    employees and employees of the domestic violence shelter 9    or service in age, sex, geographic location or other 10    relevant demographic variables, plus an amount sufficient 11    to pay for the additional administrative costs of 12    providing coverage to employees of the domestic violence 13    shelter or service and their dependents.14        (2) In subsequent years, a further adjustment shall be 15    made to reflect the actual prior years' claims experience 16    of the employees of the domestic violence shelter or 17    service.18    Monthly payments by the domestic violence shelter or 19service or its employees for group health insurance shall be 20deposited into the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve 21Fund.22    (l) A public community college or entity organized 23pursuant to the Public Community College Act may apply to the 24Director initially to have only annuitants not covered prior 25to July 1, 1992 by the district's health plan provided health 26coverage under this Act on a non-insured basis. The community   HB4908- 17 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1college must execute a 2-year contract to participate in the 2Local Government Health Plan. Any annuitant may enroll in the 3event of a qualifying change in status, special enrollment, 4special circumstance as defined by the Director, or during the 5annual benefit choice period.6    The Director shall annually determine monthly rates of 7payment subject to the following constraints: for those 8community colleges with annuitants only enrolled, first year 9rates shall be equal to the average cost to cover claims for a 10State member adjusted for demographics, Medicare 11participation, and other factors; and in the second year, a 12further adjustment of rates shall be made to reflect the 13actual first year's claims experience of the covered 14annuitants.15    (l-5) The provisions of subsection (l) become inoperative 16on July 1, 1999.17    (m) The Director shall adopt any rules deemed necessary 18for implementation of this amendatory Act of 1989 (Public Act 1986-978).20    (n) Any child advocacy center within the State of Illinois 21may apply to the Director to have its employees, annuitants, 22and their dependents provided group health coverage under this 23Act on a non-insured basis. To participate, a child advocacy 24center must agree to enroll all of its employees and pay the 25entire cost of providing coverage for its employees. The child 26advocacy center shall not be required to enroll those of its   HB4908- 18 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1employees who are covered spouses or dependents under this 2plan or another group policy or plan providing health benefits 3as long as (1) an appropriate official from the child advocacy 4center attests that each employee not enrolled is a covered 5spouse or dependent under this plan or another group policy or 6plan and (2) at least 50% of the employees are enrolled and the 7child advocacy center remits the entire cost of providing 8coverage to those employees. Employees of a participating 9child advocacy center who are not enrolled due to coverage 10under another group health policy or plan may enroll in the 11event of a qualifying change in status, special enrollment, or 12special circumstance as defined by the Director or during the 13annual benefit choice period. A participating child advocacy 14center may also elect to cover its annuitants. Dependent 15coverage shall be offered on an optional basis, with the costs 16paid by the child advocacy center, its employees, or some 17combination of the 2 as determined by the child advocacy 18center. The child advocacy center shall be responsible for 19timely collection and transmission of dependent premiums.20    The Director shall annually determine rates of payment, 21subject to the following constraints:22        (1) In the first year of coverage, the rates shall be 23    equal to the amount normally charged to State employees 24    for elected optional coverages or for enrolled dependents 25    coverages or other contributory coverages on behalf of its 26    employees, adjusted for differences between State   HB4908- 19 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1    employees and employees of the child advocacy center in 2    age, sex, geographic location, or other relevant 3    demographic variables, plus an amount sufficient to pay 4    for the additional administrative costs of providing 5    coverage to employees of the child advocacy center and 6    their dependents.7        (2) In subsequent years, a further adjustment shall be 8    made to reflect the actual prior years' claims experience 9    of the employees of the child advocacy center.10    Monthly payments by the child advocacy center or its 11employees for group health insurance shall be deposited into 12the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund.13    (o) In this subsection, "health insurance company", 14"provider", and "site-neutral payment" have the meanings given 15to those terms in Section 368h of the Illinois Insurance Code. 16The Department of Central Management Services shall require 17all contracts, managed care arrangements, and third-party 18administrator agreements under the State Employees Group 19Insurance Program to apply site-neutral payment principles for 20covered services. The Department may adopt rules necessary to 21implement this Act, including, but not limited to, rules 22addressing: 23        (1) identification of services subject to site-neutral 24    payment; 25        (2) methodologies for determining equivalent 26    reimbursement rates; and   HB4908- 20 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1        (3) reporting and compliance requirements for 2    providers, contractors, and health insurance companies. 3(Source: P.A. 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 4    Section 10. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 368h as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/368h new)7    Sec. 368h. Site-neutral payment principles. 8    (a) In this Section:9    "Health insurance company" means any health maintenance 10organization, preferred provider organization, or other entity 11that pays for, manages, or arranges for other entities to pay 12for health care services provided in this State. 13    "Provider" means any individual or entity licensed or 14otherwise authorized under Illinois law to provide health care 15services. 16    "Site-neutral payment" means reimbursement for a covered 17health care service at the same rate, regardless of the 18setting in which the service is provided, when the service is 19clinically comparable and furnished by a health care provider 20acting within the scope of the provider's license. 21    (b) The Department shall instruct health insurance 22companies operating in this State to apply site-neutral 23payment principles for any covered service for any health 24insurance product the health insurance company sells, manages,   HB4908- 21 -LRB104 18917 BAB 32362 b1offers, or markets in the State. 2    (c) The Department may adopt rules necessary to implement 3this Act, including, but not limited to, rules addressing: 4        (1) identification of services subject to site-neutral 5    payment; 6        (2) methodologies for determining equivalent 7    reimbursement rates; and 8        (3) reporting and compliance requirements for 9    providers, contractors, and health insurance companies.  10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 111, 2027.